District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1813.07

Application of subchapter.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 504, 27 DCR 3390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(ee)(2), 48 DCR 334

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1813.7.

Prior Codifications

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”

Editor's Notes